Utah statutes.
26-4-6.   Investigation of deaths -- Requests for autopsies.

(1)  The following have authority to investigate a death described in Section 26-4-7 and any other case which may be within their jurisdiction:

(a)  the attorney general or an assistant attorney general;

(b)  the district attorney or county attorney who has criminal jurisdiction over the death or case;

(c)  a deputy of the district attorney or county attorney described in Subsection (1)(b); or

(d)  a peace officer within the jurisdiction described in Subsection (1)(b).

(2)  If, in the opinion of the medical examiner, an autopsy should be performed or if an autopsy is requested by the district attorney or county attorney having criminal jurisdiction, or by the attorney general, the autopsy shall be performed by the medical examiner or a regional pathologist.



Amended by Chapter 63, 2009 General Session

